Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.4945

Limitation as to earnable compensation of member as member of the legislature.

Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 41.32.010, 41.32.260, 41.32.497, 41.32.498 and this section, when the salary of any member as a member of the legislature is increased beyond the amount provided for in Initiative Measure No. 282 then earnable compensation for the purposes of this chapter shall be based solely on the sum of (1) the compensation actually received from the salary for the job from which such leave of absence may have been taken and (2) such member's salary as a legislator during the two highest compensated consecutive years.

[ 1991 c 35 s 54; 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Emergency—Severability—Construction—1974 ex.s. c 199: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.